src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* **LEXICON NMN_ĪKŠ** : 217 
* **LEXICON NMN_ĪKŠ-SG** : 217
* **LEXICON NMN_ĪKŠ-PL** : 217

* **LEXICON NMN_KAKŠ** : 218
* **LEXICON NMN_KAKŠ-SG** : 218
* **LEXICON NMN_KAKŠ-PL** : 218

* **LEXICON NMN_ŪŽ** : 219 ūž:ūd
* Yaml: **A-uuzh**
word-final consonant palatalization (ž): Sg_Nom, Pl_Par, Pl_Ill, Pl_Ela
* **LEXICON NMN_ŪŽ-SG** : 219

* **LEXICON NMN_ŪŽ-PL** : 219

* **LEXICON NMN_SĒŅ** sēņ:sēn 220
Sg_Nom = consonant-final 1-syllable word
word-final consonant palatalization: Sg_Nom, Pl_Par, Pl_Ill, Pl_Ela
Diphthong realized as mid long vowel: Sg_Nom, Pl_Par, Pl_Ill, Pl_Ela

* **LEXICON NMN_SĒŅ-PL** sēņ:sēn 211

* **LEXICON NMN_JŪŖ** : jūŗ:jūr 221 
Sg_Nom = consonant-final 1-syllable word
word-final consonant palatalization: Sg_Nom, Pl_Par, Pl_Ill, Pl_Ela
* **LEXICON NMN_JŪŖ-SG** jūŗ:jūr 221

* **LEXICON NMN_JŪŖ-PL** : 221
* **PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;** jūrd

* **LEXICON NMN_SŪR** : 222 sūr:sūr

* **LEXICON NMN_SŪR-PL** sūr:sūr 211

* **LEXICON NMN_SĒR** : 223
* **LEXICON NMN_SĒR-SG** : 223 sēr:
* **LEXICON NMN_SĒR-PL** : 223

* **LEXICON NMN_BIRKOV** : 224 birkov:birkov
* **LEXICON NMN_BIRKOV-SG** : 224
* **LEXICON NMN_BIRKOV-PL** : 224

225

* **LEXICON NMN_UMĀRZ** 226 umārz:umār

226, 227, 228
* **LEXICON NMN_DULLÕNZ** dullõnz:dullõn 227
* **LEXICON NMN_DULLÕNZ-SG** dullõnz:dullõn 227

* **LEXICON NMN_DULLÕNZ-PL** dullõnz:dullõn 227

* **LEXICON NMN_AʼBBÕNZ-SG** aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228

* **LEXICON NMN_AʼBBÕNZ-PL** aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228

* **LEXICON NMN_AŅGÕRZ** : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229

* **LEXICON NMN_AŅGÕRZ-PL** : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229

* **LEXICON NMN_KAʼGGÕRZ** kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230

* **LEXICON NMN_PǞGIŅŽ** pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231

* **LEXICON NMN_PǞGIŅŽ-PL** pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231
* **LEXICON NMN_VAGĀŖ** vagāŗ:vagār 232

* **LEXICON NMN_VAGĀŖ-PL** vagāŗ:vagār 232

* **LEXICON NMN_KŪOLÕN** kūolõn:kūolõn 232

* **LEXICON NMN_KŪOLÕN-PL** kūolõn:kūolõn 232

233

* **LEXICON NMN_PĒGAL** pēgal:pēgal 234

* **LEXICON NMN_APPÕN** appõn:appõn 235

* **LEXICON NMN_APPÕN-PL** appõn:appõn 235

* **LEXICON NMN_ǬʼRÕN** ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236

* **LEXICON NMN_ǬʼRÕN-SG** ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236

* **LEXICON NMN_ǬʼRÕN-PL** ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236

* **LEXICON NMN_KĪNDÕR** kīndõr:kīndõr 237

* **LEXICON NMN_KĪNDÕR-PL** kīndõr:kīndõr 237

* **LEXICON NMN_BÄʼZMÕR-SG** bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238

* **LEXICON NMN_BÄʼZMÕR-PL** bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238

* **LEXICON NMN_TARĪĻ** tarīļ:tarīļ 239

* **LEXICON NMN_TARĪĻ-PL** tarīļ:tarīļ 239

* **LEXICON NMN_ĀNKAŖ** ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240

* __LEXICON NMN_ĀNKAŖ-PL__ ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240

* __LEXICON NMN_VIRPÕĻ__ virpõļ:virpõļ 241
* __LEXICON NMN_VIRPÕĻ-SG__ virpõļ:virpõļ 241

* __LEXICON NMN_VIRPÕĻ-PL__ virpõļ:virpõļ 241

* **LEXICON NMN_ǬʼBIĻ** ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
* __LEXICON NMN_ǬʼBIĻ-SG__ ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242

* __LEXICON NMN_ǬʼBIĻ-PL__ ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242

SG-DAT	;
SG-ELA	;
SG-ILL	;
SG-INS	;
SG-PAR	;

## NUMBER AND CASE

above as pair in SG-ELA/INE_st; 2014 jaska

* **LEXICON PL-DAT_õn** This is peculiar to NMN_PŪOL-PL 216,219

* **LEXICON PL-INS_kõks** This is peculiar to NMN_PŪOL-PL  216

A trigger for z:ž will be required

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
